Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-712
State Wild Game Preserve; firearms, hunting, and fishing prohibited.

Except as provided in section 37-713, it shall be unlawful for any person to carry firearms, hunt, or fish within the limits of the State Wild Game Preserve.

Laws 1927, c. 30, § 3, p. 147;

C.S.1929, § 37-417;

R.S.1943, § 37-417;

Laws 1961, c. 169, § 4, p. 503;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-417;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 326.